assets/javascript/tinymce/plugins/spellchecker/dicts/es_ES.aff
SFX  edir idindole edir
SFX  edir idindoles edir
SFX  eguir iguindole eguir
SFX  eguir iguindoles eguir
SFX  estir istindole estir
SFX  estir istindoles estir
SFX  ecir icindole ecir
SFX  ecir icindoles ecir
SFX  er indole er
SFX  er indoles er
SFX  r yndole or
SFX  r yndoles or
SFX  r ndole ucir
SFX  r ndoles ucir
SFX  r ndole irir
SFX  r ndoles irir

SFX  Y 140
SFX  er indomela er
SFX  er indomelo er
SFX  er indomelas er
SFX  er indomelos er
SFX  er indonosla er
SFX  er indonoslo er
SFX  er indonoslas er
SFX  er indonoslos er
SFX  er indoosla er
SFX  er indooslo er
SFX  er indooslas er
SFX  er indooslos er
SFX  er indosela er
SFX  er indoselo er
SFX  er indoselas er
SFX  er indoselos er
SFX  er indotela er
SFX  er indotelo er
SFX  er indotelas er
SFX  er indotelos er
SFX  ertir irtindomela ertir
SFX  ertir irtindomelo ertir
SFX  ertir irtindomelas ertir
SFX  ertir irtindomelos ertir
SFX  ertir irtindotela ertir
SFX  ertir irtindotelo ertir
SFX  ertir irtindotelas ertir
SFX  ertir irtindotelos ertir
SFX  ertir irtindosela ertir
SFX  ertir irtindoselo ertir
SFX  ertir irtindoselas ertir
SFX  ertir irtindoselos ertir
SFX  ertir irtindonosla ertir
SFX  ertir irtindonoslo ertir
SFX  ertir irtindonoslas ertir
SFX  ertir irtindonoslos ertir
SFX  ertir irtindoosla ertir
SFX  ertir irtindooslo ertir
SFX  ertir irtindooslas ertir
SFX  ertir irtindooslos ertir
SFX  endir indindomela endir
SFX  endir indindomelas endir
SFX  endir indindomelo endir
SFX  endir indindomelos endir
SFX  endir indindonosla endir
SFX  endir indindonoslas endir
SFX  endir indindonoslo endir
SFX  endir indindonoslos endir
SFX  endir indindoosla endir
SFX  endir indindooslas endir
SFX  endir indindooslo endir
SFX  endir indindooslos endir
SFX  endir indindosela endir
SFX  endir indindoselas endir
SFX  endir indindoselo endir
SFX  endir indindoselos endir
SFX  endir indindotela endir
SFX  endir indindotelas endir
SFX  endir indindotelo endir
SFX  endir indindotelos endir
SFX  ir yndomela [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndomelo [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndomelas [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndomelos [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndotela [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndotelo [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndotelas [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndotelos [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndosela [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndoselo [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndoselas [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndoselos [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndonosla [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndonoslo [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndonoslas [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndonoslos [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndoosla [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndooslo [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndooslas [^g]uir
SFX  ir yndooslos [^g]uir
SFX  edir idindomela edir
SFX  edir idindomelo edir
SFX  edir idindomelas edir
SFX  edir idindomelos edir
SFX  edir idindotela edir
SFX  edir idindotelo edir
SFX  edir idindotelas edir
SFX  edir idindotelos edir
SFX  edir idindosela edir
SFX  edir idindoselo edir
SFX  edir idindoselas edir
SFX  edir idindoselos edir
SFX  edir idindonosla edir
SFX  edir idindonoslo edir
SFX  edir idindonoslas edir
SFX  edir idindonoslos edir
SFX  edir idindoosla edir
SFX  edir idindooslo edir
SFX  edir idindooslas edir
SFX  edir idindooslos edir
SFX  ecir icindomela ecir
SFX  ecir icindomelo ecir
SFX  ecir icindomelas ecir
SFX  ecir icindomelos ecir
SFX  ecir icindotela ecir
SFX  ecir icindotelo ecir
SFX  ecir icindotelas ecir
SFX  ecir icindotelos ecir
SFX  ecir icindosela ecir
SFX  ecir icindoselo ecir
SFX  ecir icindoselas ecir
SFX  ecir icindoselos ecir
SFX  ecir icindonosla ecir
SFX  ecir icindonoslo ecir
SFX  ecir icindonoslas ecir
SFX  ecir icindonoslos ecir
SFX  ecir icindoosla ecir
SFX  ecir icindooslo ecir
SFX  ecir icindooslas ecir
SFX  ecir icindooslos ecir
SFX  r yndomela or
SFX  r yndomelo or
SFX  r yndomelas or
SFX  r yndomelos or
SFX  r yndotela or
SFX  r yndotelo or
SFX  r yndotelas or
SFX  r yndotelos or
SFX  r yndosela or
SFX  r yndoselo or
SFX  r yndoselas or
SFX  r yndoselos or
SFX  r yndonosla or
SFX  r yndonoslo or
SFX  r yndonoslas or
SFX  r yndonoslos or
SFX  r yndoosla or
SFX  r yndooslo or
SFX  r yndooslas or
SFX  r yndooslos or

SFX  Y 380
SFX  abar bala abar
SFX  abar balas abar
SFX  abar balo abar
SFX  abar balos abar
SFX  r dla r
SFX  r dlas r
SFX  r dlo r
SFX  r dlos r
SFX  acar cala acar
SFX  acar calas acar
SFX  acar calo acar
SFX  acar calos acar
SFX  achar chala achar
SFX  achar chalas achar
SFX  achar chalo achar
SFX  achar chalos achar
SFX  adir dela adir
SFX  adir delas adir
SFX  adir delo adir
SFX  adir delos adir
SFX  agar gala agar
SFX  agar galas agar
SFX  agar galo agar
SFX  agar galos agar
SFX  ajar jala ajar
SFX  ajar jalas ajar
SFX  ajar jalo ajar
SFX  ajar jalos ajar
SFX  alar lala alar
SFX  alar lalas alar
SFX  alar lalo alar
SFX  alar lalos alar
SFX  amar mala amar
SFX  amar malas amar
SFX  amar malo amar
SFX  amar malos amar
SFX  ambiar mbiala ambiar
SFX  ambiar mbialas ambiar
SFX  ambiar mbialo ambiar
SFX  ambiar mbialos ambiar
SFX  andar ndala andar
SFX  andar ndalas andar
SFX  andar ndalo andar
SFX  andar ndalos andar
SFX  ansar nsala ansar
SFX  ansar nsalas ansar
SFX  ansar nsalo ansar
SFX  ansar nsalos ansar
SFX  antar ntala antar
SFX  antar ntalas antar
SFX  antar ntalo antar
SFX  antar ntalos antar
SFX  anzar nzala anzar
SFX  anzar nzalas anzar
SFX  anzar nzalo anzar
SFX  anzar nzalos anzar
SFX  aar ala aar
SFX  aar alas aar
SFX  aar alo aar
SFX  aar alos aar
SFX  apar pala apar
SFX  apar palas apar
SFX  apar palo apar
SFX  apar palos apar
SFX  arar rala arar
SFX  arar ralas arar
SFX  arar ralo arar
SFX  arar ralos arar
SFX  arcar rcala arcar
SFX  arcar rcalas arcar
SFX  arcar rcalo arcar
SFX  arcar rcalos arcar
SFX  arcir rcela arcir
SFX  arcir rcelas arcir
SFX  arcir rcelo arcir
SFX  arcir rcelos arcir
SFX  ardar rdala ardar
SFX  ardar rdalas ardar
SFX  ardar rdalo ardar
SFX  ardar rdalos ardar
SFX  argar rgala argar
SFX  argar rgalas argar
SFX  argar rgalo argar
SFX  argar rgalos argar
SFX  arrar rrala arrar
SFX  arrar rralas arrar
SFX  arrar rralo arrar
SFX  arrar rralos arrar
SFX  artar rtala artar
SFX  artar rtalas artar
SFX  artar rtalo artar
SFX  artar rtalos artar
SFX  artir rtela artir
SFX  artir rtelas artir
SFX  artir rtelo artir
SFX  artir rtelos artir
SFX  asar sala asar
SFX  asar salas asar
SFX  asar salo asar
SFX  asar salos asar
SFX  astar stala astar
SFX  astar stalas astar
SFX  astar stalo astar
SFX  astar stalos astar
SFX  astrar strala astrar
SFX  astrar stralas astrar
SFX  astrar stralo astrar
SFX  astrar stralos astrar
SFX  atar tala atar
SFX  atar talas atar
SFX  atar talo atar
SFX  atar talos atar
SFX  atir tela atir
SFX  atir telas atir
SFX  atir telo atir
SFX  atir telos atir
SFX  avar vala avar
SFX  avar valas avar
SFX  avar valo avar
SFX  avar valos avar
SFX  azar zala azar
SFX  azar zalas azar
SFX  azar zalo azar
SFX  azar zalos azar
SFX  ear ala ear
SFX  ear alas ear
SFX  ear alo ear
SFX  ear alos ear
SFX  eber bela eber
SFX  eber belas eber
SFX  eber belo eber
SFX  eber belos eber
SFX  echar chala echar
SFX  echar chalas echar
SFX  echar chalo echar
SFX  echar chalos echar
SFX  eer ela eer
SFX  eer elas eer
SFX  eer elo eer
SFX  eer elos eer
SFX  egar gala egar
SFX  egar galas egar
SFX  egar galo egar
SFX  egar galos egar
SFX  ejar jala ejar
SFX  ejar jalas ejar
SFX  ejar jalo ejar
SFX  ejar jalos ejar
SFX  elar lala elar
SFX  elar lalas elar
SFX  elar lalo elar
SFX  elar lalos elar
SFX  emar mala emar
SFX  emar malas emar
SFX  emar malo emar
SFX  emar malos emar
SFX  enar nala enar
SFX  enar nalas enar
SFX  enar nalo enar
SFX  enar nalos enar
SFX  ender ndela ender
SFX  ender ndelas ender
SFX  ender ndelo ender
SFX  ender ndelos ender
SFX  entar ntala entar
SFX  entar ntalas entar
SFX  entar ntalo entar
SFX  entar ntalos entar
SFX  eptar ptala eptar
SFX  eptar ptalas eptar
SFX  eptar ptalo eptar
SFX  eptar ptalos eptar
SFX  erar rala erar
SFX  erar ralas erar
SFX  erar ralo erar
SFX  erar ralos erar
SFX  ervar rvala ervar
SFX  ervar rvalas ervar
SFX  ervar rvalo ervar
SFX  ervar rvalos ervar
SFX  esar sala esar
SFX  esar salas esar
SFX  esar salo esar
SFX  esar salos esar
SFX  escar scala escar
SFX  escar scalas escar
SFX  escar scalo escar
