assets/javascript/tinymce/plugins/spellchecker/dicts/es_ES.dic
abundancia/rS
abundan/rt
abunda/rt
abund/tr
abundo/rt
abund/tr
agua/irh
aguan/rhi
aguar/RhiEDr
agudo/SGr
agen/rih
aguo/irGh
agu/rih
alcen/rp
alce/rSp
aliento/hrS
alimentabais/r
alimentaban/r
alimentaba/rS
alimentado/rS
alimentis/r
alimentando/r
alimentndose/r
alimenta/r
alimentarais/r
alimentramos/r
alimentarn/r
alimentara/r
alimentar/r
alimentareis/r
alimentaris/r
alimentaremos/r
alimentaren/r
alimentar/r
alimentare/rGS
alimentaramos/r
alimentaran/r
alimentara/rS
alimentarse/r
alimentaseis/r
alimentsemos/r
alimentase/r
alimentas/rS
alimentasteis/r
alimentemos/r
alimenten/r
aliment/r
alimento/r
aliment/r
alzad/rp
alza/rp
alzar/RprDE
alz/rp
aadan/r
aada/r
aaden/r
aada/r
aadid/r
aadi/r
aads/r
aado/r
arad/rp
ara/pr
arar/pRrDE
arco/ri
aren/trp
ar/ptr
aro/pr
asad/r
asan/r
asa/r
as/r
ase/rSG
aso/r
barris/r
barramos/r
barran/irh
barris/r
barremos/r
barren/irh
barrer/r
barrers/r
barreris/r
barrer/r
barrerais/r
barreramos/r
barrera/rS
barrerse/r
barre/SGirh
barran/r
barra/rS
barrida/r
barriendo/r
barrindose/r
barrierais/r
barrieran/r
barriera/r
barriereis/r
barrieren/r
barriere/rSG
barrieron/r
barrisemos/r
barriesen/r
barriese/rS
barri/ri
barr/r
barristeis/r
beba/ihr
beban/irh
bebed/irh
beben/irh
beber/hRiErD
beba/hri
beb/rhi
bebo/iLhr
calentamiento/rS
cama/brSpaih
cara/rSahil
cargaba/hSpr
cargbamos/r
cargaban/hpr
cargad/hGipr
cargis/rph
cargamos/hpr
cargando/hpr
cargan/iprh
cargara/hpr
cargarais/rh
cargaran/hpr
cargarn/rph
cargar/rph
cargare/hGSpr
cargareis/rh
cargaris/rh
cargaren/hpr
cargar/rph
cargaramos/r
cargara/rSph
cargaron/hpr
cargaseis/rh
cargasen/hpr
cargasteis/r
cargue/hSipr
carguemos/rh
cejo/pjfr
cena/gr
cenar/RrDE
cen/r
cercos/r
cerrado/rihSjG
cogedor/SGpar
cogen/bprajhi
cogers/ihjbr
cogeremos/jrb
cogeramos/jr
cogerle/rS
cogeros/ri
cogais/rbhji
cog/brijahp
cogindose/jr
cogieran/bjr
cogiereis/brj
cogieron/bjr
cogiese/riShbj
cogi/bihjarp
coja/bphajir
cojo/bGphraji
copas/r
crecis/r
crecern/r
crecers/r
crecer/r
creceran/r
crecerse/r
crecan/r
crecido/rGS
crecindose/r
crecieran/r
creciremos/r
creciere/rGS
creciesen/r
crecimos/r
crecisteis/r
crezcis/r
crezco/hpgarG
cubierta/phrSi
curan/rop
curen/rop
cure/rSGop
dicha/phfnlrbj
dorabais/rh
doraban/hrp
doris/hpr
dorndose/r
dora/pahr
dorramos/r
dorara/rph
dorar/hpr
doraris/rh
doraren/hrp
doraramos/r
doraron/hrp
dorsemos/r
dorase/rph
doris/hpr
dore/pGSrah
doro/pahr
entended/thrs
entend/rhst
entiendo/trhs
exceded/r
excede/rSG
excedi/r
excitad/r
excitar/rRDE
excit/r
excit/r
flores/r
gana/ahr
ganar/hRrDaE
gan/rha
gan/rha
gira/r
giren/r
gir/r
hilad/riahp
hora/rSh
humana/krS
impreso/pGSr
imprimen/rp
imprima/rp
imprim/rp
imprimo/pr
lecho/rS
llenan/rp
llenen/rp
llene/SGrp
lleva/fr
llev/fr
lleven/fr
manera/ra
mesa/prSo
nadan/r
nad/r
nad/r
naturalmente/rf
parto/Srp
pasaban/rpho
pasad/orGhp
pasamos/rpho
pasndose/r
pasara/hrpo
pasarn/ohpr
pasars/ohpr
pasareis/rho
pasaren/rpho
pasarais/r
pasaran/ohr
pasarlo/rGSp
pasaron/rpho
pasarse/rpho
pasaseis/hor
pasas/rSpho
pasaste/rpho
pasen/orph
pas/orph
peso/rSp
pintaban/rph
pintad/pGrh
pintamos/rph
pintan/prh
pintramos/r
pintaran/rph
pintareis/hr
pintremos/r
pintare/prSGh
pintaramos/r
pintaron/rph
pintaseis/hr
pintase/phr
pintaste/rph
pintemos/rhp
pint/prh
ponen/ukgptalonbr
poneros/koprl
pongo/ukgptalonbr
ponindome/rk
ponindote/rk
primado/rGS
pujad/rip
pujan/rip
pujar/pREriD
pujen/rip
pujo/pri
ropas/r
salen/pgr
salgo/pr
saliente/rS
sals/rp
saltabais/r
saltaba/rSp
saltis/pr
saltndome/r
saltando/rp
saltan/rap
saltarais/r
saltaran/rp
saltareis/r
saltaremos/r
saltaren/rp
saltare/rSGp
saltaran/r
saltarme/r
saltaron/rp
saltarte/r
saltsemos/r
saltase/rp
saltasteis/r
saltemos/pr
salte/rSGpa
sanad/psr
sanar/sRpDrE
sane/pGSsr
sean/gra
sembr/rp
siembra/pr
siembro/pr
sol/argsfk
suela/sgafr
suelen/sfrag
tarde/rSp
utilizacin/rS
venga/afongplrst
venid/afongplrst
verted/pr
verti/pr
vesta/prkih
vest/hkirp
viene/lnrtspgafo
viento/rSGa
vierte/frkSGsp
vine/noltirafgps
vistes/ajihrkp
visto/nikroGpahj
vivan/rpahf
viva/fhpr
vivientes/r
viv/pfrh
vivs/fhpr
vol/pr
vuela/pr
vuelo/pr
